nb: Type svømmetrener: Ryggflyter; Flyteshorts; Flytejakke; Havfruehale; Svømmefallskjerm; Puddle jumper; Haifinne; Svømmebelte; Svømmering; Annet
it: Tipo di attrezzo per nuoto: Galleggiante per la schiena; Pantaloncini galleggianti; Giacca galleggiante; Coda da sirena; Paracadute da allenamento; Puddle jumper; Pinna di squalo; Cintura da nuoto; Salvagente da allenamento; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de simulador de natação: Flutuador de costas; Shorts de flutuação; Jaqueta flutuadora; Cauda de sereia; Treinador com paraquedas; Boia de braço e peito; Barbatana de tubarão; Cinto de natação; Treinador com boia de cintura; Outro
tr: Yüzme eğitici tipi: Sırtüstü yüzme şamandırası; Yüzdürme şortu; Yüzdürme yeleği; Denizkızı kuyruğu; Direnç paraşütü; Yüzücü yeleği (kolluklu); Köpekbalığı yüzgeci; Yüzme kemeri; Simit eğitici; Diğer
el: Τύπος εκπαιδευτικού βοηθήματος κολύμβησης: Πλωτήρας πλάτης; Σορτς επίπλευσης; Γιλέκο επίπλευσης; Ουρά γοργόνας; Αλεξίπτωτο προπόνησης; Σωσίβιο puddle jumper; Πτερύγιο καρχαρία; Ζώνη κολύμβησης; Κουλούρα προπόνησης; Άλλο
sv: Typ av simredskap: Ryggflöte; Flytshorts; Simväst; Sjöjungfrustjärt; Motståndsskärm; Puddle jumper; Hajfena; Simbälte; Simring; Annan
sk-SK: Typ plaveckého trenažéra: Chrbtový plavák; Nadnášacie šortky; Plávacia vesta; Chvost morskej panny; Odporový padák; Puddle jumper; Žraločia plutva; Plavecký pás; Plavecký kolesový trenažér; Iný
ro-RO: Tip de echipament pentru antrenament la înot: Flotor pentru spate; Pantaloni scurți de flotabilitate; Vestă de flotabilitate; Coadă de sirenă; Parașută de antrenament; Aripioare de înot tip vestă; Înotătoare de rechin; Centură de înot; Colac de antrenament; Altele
es: Tipo de dispositivo de aprendizaje de natación: Flotador de espalda; Pantalones cortos de flotabilidad; Chaleco flotador; Cola de sirena; Entrenador con paracaídas; Puddle jumper; Aleta de tiburón; Cinturón de natación; Aro de natación de entrenamiento; Otro
de: Art des Schwimmtrainers: Rücken-Schwimmhilfe; Auftriebsshorts; Schwimmweste; Meerjungfrauenflosse; Widerstandsfallschirm; Puddle Jumper; Haifischflosse; Schwimmgürtel; Schwimmring-Trainer; Sonstige
bg-BG: Тип тренажор за плуване: Плувка за гръб; Шорти за плаваемост; Плаваща жилетка; Опашка на русалка; Тренажор с парашут; Детска жилетка с ръкави (Puddle Jumper); Акулска перка; Колан за плуване; Тренажор с надуваем пояс; Друго
hu: Úszástanuló eszköz típusa: Hátúszó segédeszköz; Felhajtóerőt növelő nadrág; Úszómellény; Sellőfarok; Ejtőernyős edző; Karúszós úszómellény; Cápauszony; Úszóöv; Úszógumi; Egyéb
ru: Тип тренажера для плавания: Поплавок на спину; Шорты-поплавки; Жилет-поплавок; Хвост русалки; Тренажер-парашют; Плавательный жилет с нарукавниками; Акулий плавник; Пояс для плавания; Тренажер-круг для плавания; Другое
zh-CN: 游泳训练器类型: 背部浮板; 浮力短裤; 浮力夹克; 美人鱼尾; 阻力伞训练器; 臂圈浮力背心; 鲨鱼鳍背浮; 游泳腰带; 游泳圈训练器; 其他
en: Swim trainer type: Back float; Buoyancy shorts; Float jacket; Mermaid tail; Parachute trainer; Puddle jumper; Shark fin; Swim belt; Swim ring trainer; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta trenera za plivanje: Plovak za leđa; Hlače za plutanje; Plutajući prsluk; Rep sirene; Padobran za plivanje; Mišići s pojasom; Peraja morskog psa; Pojas za plivanje; Kolut za plivanje; Ostalo
da: Svømmetræner-type: Rygsvømmebælte; Flydeshorts; Flydejakke; Havfruehale; Faldskærmstræner; Puddle jumper; Hajfinne; Svømmebælte; Svømmeringstræner; Andet
lt-LT: Plaukimo treniruoklio tipas: Nugaros plūduras; Plūduriuojantys šortai; Plūduriuojanti liemenė; Undinėlės uodega; Pasipriešinimo parašiutas; Plaukimo liemenė su rankovėmis; Ryklio pelekas; Plaukimo diržas; Plaukimo ratas - treniruoklis; Kita
fr: Type d'entraîneur de natation: Flotteur dorsal; Short de flottaison; Veste de flottaison; Queue de sirène; Parachute d’entraînement; Puddle jumper; Aileron de requin; Ceinture de natation; Bouée d’entraînement; Autre
cs: Typ plaveckého trenažéru: Zádový plovák; Nadnášecí šortky; Plovací vesta; Ploutev mořské panny; Plavecký padák; Rukávky s pásem; Žraločí ploutev; Plavecký pás; Plavecký kruh; Jiné
ko: 수영 트레이너 유형: 백 플로트; 부력 반바지; 플로트 재킷; 머메이드 테일; 패러슈트 트레이너; 퍼들 점퍼; 상어 지느러미; 수영 벨트; 수영 링 트레이너; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de acessório de treino de natação: Flutuador de costas; Calções de flutuação; Colete flutuante; Cauda de sereia; Paraquedas de treino; Puddle jumper; Barbatana de tubarão; Cinto de natação; Boia de natação de treino; Outro
th: ประเภทของอุปกรณ์ฝึกว่ายน้ำ: ห่วงลอยหลัง; กางเกงขาสั้นพยุงตัว; เสื้อชูชีพ; หางนางเงือก; ฝึกว่ายน้ำต้านร่มชูชีพ; พุดเดิลจัมเปอร์; ครีบฉลาม; เข็มขัดว่ายน้ำ; ห่วงยางฝึกว่ายน้ำ; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập bơi: Phao lưng; Quần tạo nổi; Áo phao; Đuôi tiên cá; Dù tập bơi; Áo phao tay (Puddle jumper); Vây cá mập; Đai bơi; Phao bơi tròn; Khác
fi: Uimaharjoittelulaitteen tyyppi: Selkäkelluke; Kelluttavat shortsit; Kelluntatakki; Merenneidon pyrstö; Laskuvarjoharjoitteluväline; Puddle jumper -kelluke; Hainevä; Uimavyö; Uimarengas; Muu
nl: Type zwemtrainer: Rugdrijver; Drijfbroekje; Drijfvest; Zeemeerminstaart; Parachutetrainer; Puddle jumper; Haaienvin; Zwemgordel; Zwembandtrainer; Overig
pl: Typ trenera pływackiego: Pływak na plecy; Spodenki wypornościowe; Kamizelka do pływania; Ogon syreny; Spadochron treningowy; Puddle jumper; Płetwa rekina; Pas do pływania; Kółko do nauki pływania; Inny
zh-TW: 游泳訓練鞋類型: 背漂浮板; 浮力褲; 浮力背心; 美人魚尾巴; 阻力傘訓練器; 臂圈浮力背心; 鯊魚鰭背漂; 游泳浮力腰帶; 游泳訓練圈; 其他
ja: スイムトレーナータイプ: バックフロート; 浮力ショーツ; フロートジャケット; マーメイドテール; パラシュートトレーナー; パドルジャンパー; シャークフィン; スイムベルト; 浮き輪トレーナー; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta pripomočka za učenje plavanja: Hrbtni plovec; Plavalne hlače z vzgonom; Plavalni jopič; Rep morske deklice; Padalo za vadbo; Plavalni rokavčki/jopič (Puddle Jumper); Plavut morskega psa; Plavalni pas; Plavalni obroč za vadbo; Drugo